Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle C. Circuit Court Judges and Chancellors.

§ 23-15-1011.
Time of taking office; term of office.

Circuit court judges and chancery court judges so elected shall take office at the time, and hold office for the term, provided in Sections 9-5-1 and 9-7-1, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-237 [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6838; 1930, § 6282; 1942, § 3311; Laws, 1914, ch. 150; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 301, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-1013.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1994, ch 564, § 102, eff from and after September 6, 1994 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the repeal of this section).

[Derived from 1942 Code § 3148 [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6428; 1930, § 5901; Laws, 1914, ch. 150; Repealed by Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 33, and 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; En, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 302, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§ 23-15-1015.
Dates of elections; applicability to elections of laws regulating general elections.

On Tuesday after the first Monday in November 1986, and every four (4) years thereafter and concurrently with the election for representatives in Congress, there shall be held an election in every county for judges of the several circuit and chancery court districts. The laws regulating the general elections shall, except as otherwise provided for in Sections 23-15-974 through 23-15-985, apply to and govern elections of judges of the circuit and chancery courts.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-235 [Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6837; 1930, § 6281; 1942, § 3310; Laws, 1914, ch. 150; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 303; Laws, 1994, ch. 564, § 96; Laws, 2002, ch. 356, § 4, eff July 22, 2002 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).